Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.375

Investment in stock, participation certificates, and other evidences of participation.

Any bank may invest in the stock or participation certificates of production credit associations, federal intermediate credit banks and the stock or other evidences of participation of federal land banks in amounts consistent with safe and sound practice in conducting the business of the bank.

[ 2014 c 37 s 130; 1982 c 86 s 1. Formerly RCW 30.04.375.]